en: Cymbal type: China; Crash; Effects; Hi-hat (controller); Hi-hat (pad); Multi-purpose/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Other
sk-SK: Typ činelov: China; Crash; Efektové; Hi-hat (ovládač); Hi-hat (pad); Viacúčelový/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Iné
bg-BG: Тип чинел: Чайна; Краш; Ефектен; Фус (контролер); Фус (пад); Многофункционален/Краш-райд; Райд; Сплаш; Стак; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta činele: China; Crash; Efekti; Hi-hat (krmilnik); Hi-hat (blazinica); Večnamenska/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Drugo
ru: Тип тарелки: Чайна (China); Крэш (Crash); Эффект (Effects); Хай-хэт (контроллер); Хай-хэт (пэд); Универсальная / Крэш-райд (Crash-Ride); Райд (Ride); Сплэш (Splash); Стэк (Stack); Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta činele: China; Crash; Efekti; Hi-hat (kontroler); Hi-hat (pad); Višenamjenski / crash-ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Ostalo
th: ประเภทฉาบ: ไชน่า; แครช; เอฟเฟกต์; ไฮแฮท (คอนโทรลเลอร์); ไฮแฮท (แพด); อเนกประสงค์/แครช-ไรด์; ไรด์; สแปลช; สแต็ก; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Lėkštės tipas: „China“; „Crash“; Efektų; „Hi-hat“ (valdiklis); „Hi-hat“ (padelis); Daugiafunkcė / „Crash-Ride“; „Ride“; „Splash“; „Stack“; Kita
fr: Type de cymbale: China; Crash; Effets; Charleston (contrôleur); Charleston (pad); Polyvalent / Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de címbalo: China; Crash; Efeitos; Chimbal (controlador); Chimbal (pad); Multiuso/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Outros
ro-RO: Tip de cinel: China; Crash; Efecte; Hi-Hat (controler); Hi-Hat (pad); Multifuncțional/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Altele
zh-TW: 鈸類型: 中國鈸; 碎音鈸; 效果鈸; 腳踏鈸 (控制器); 腳踏鈸 (打擊板); 多用途/碎音-節奏鈸; 節奏鈸; 點鈸; 疊鈸; 其他
nl: Bekken type: China; Crash; Effecten; Hihat (controller); Hihat (pad); Multifunctioneel/crash-ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Overig
ko: 심벌 유형: 차이나; 크래시; 이펙트; 하이햇(컨트롤러); 하이햇(패드); 다목적/크래시 라이드; 라이드; 스플래시; 스택; 기타
it: Tipo di piatto: China; Crash; Effetti; Hi-hat (controller); Hi-hat (pad); Multiuso/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Altro
tr: Zil tipi: China; Crash; Efekt; Hi-hat (kontrol cihazı); Hi-hat (ped); Çok amaçlı/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Diğer
es: Tipo de platillo: China; Crash; Efectos; Hi-hat (controlador); Hi-hat (pad); Multipropósito/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Otro
cs: Typ činelu: China; Crash; Efektový; Hi-hat (kontrolér); Hi-hat (pad); Víceúčelový / crash-ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Jiné
ja: シンバルタイプ: チャイナ; クラッシュ; エフェクト; ハイハット (コントローラー); ハイハット (パッド); 多目的 / クラッシュライド; ライド; スプラッシュ; スタック; その他
da: Bækkentype: China; Crash; Effekter; Hihat (controller); Hihat (pad); Multiformål/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de prato: China; Crash; Efeitos; Pratos de choques (controlador); Pratos de choques (pad); Polivalente/crash-ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Outro
el: Τύπος κυμβάλου: China; Crash; Εφέ; Hi-hat (ελεγκτής); Hi-hat (pad); Πολλαπλών χρήσεων/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Άλλο
hu: Cintányér típusa: Kína; Beütő; Effekt; Lábcin (vezérlő); Lábcin (ütőfelület); Többcélú/Kísérő-beütő; Kísérő; Splash; Stack (rakott); Egyéb
nb: Cymbaltype: China; Crash; Effekter; Hi-hat (kontroller); Hi-hat (pad); Flerbruk/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Annet
zh-CN: 镲片类型: 中国镲; 碎音镲; 效果镲; 踩镲（控制器）; 踩镲（打击垫）; 多用途/碎音-叮叮镲; 叮叮镲; 水镲; 叠镲; 其他
fi: Symbaalityyppi: China; Crash; Efektit; Hi-hat (ohjain); Hi-hat (padi); Monikäyttö / crash-ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Muu
pl: Typ talerza: China; Crash; Efektowe; Hi-hat (kontroler); Hi-hat (pad); Wielofunkcyjne / Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Inny
sv: Cymbaltyp: China; Crash; Effekter; Hi-hat (styrenhet); Hi-hat (pad); Multifunktionell/Crash-ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Annat
de: Beckentyp: China; Crash; Effekte; Hi-Hat (Controller); Hi-Hat (Pad); Mehrzweck/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Sonstige
vi: Loại chũm chọe: China; Crash; Hiệu ứng; Hi-hat (bộ điều khiển); Hi-hat (mặt đệm); Đa dụng/Crash-Ride; Ride; Splash; Stack; Khác